North Carolina statutes. Chapter 39. Conveyances.
Article 4. Voluntary Organizations and Associations. [Repealed]

§§ 39-24,
39-25.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2006-226, s. 2(a), effective January 1, 2007.

§ 39-26.

Recodified as G.S. 59B-15(a) by Session Laws 2006-226, s. 2(b), effective January 1, 2007.

§ 39-27.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 59B-15(b) by Session Laws 2006-226, s. 2(b), effective January 1, 2007.